test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vaoma73_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `vaoma2: # Verb (73) `vaoma2 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     vaoma+V+Inf/mA: vaoma
     vaoma+V+Inf: vaioq
     vaoma+V+Act+PrfPrc: vaonuq
     vaoma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: vaot
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vao
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaos
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vaio
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaio
